Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2060
Acupuncture; license requirements.

At the time of application for an initial license to practice acupuncture, the applicant shall present to the department proof that he or she:

(1) Has graduated from, after having successfully completed the acupuncture curriculum requirements of, a formal, full-time acupuncture program at a university, college, or school of acupuncture approved by the board which includes at least one thousand seven hundred twenty-five hours of entry-level acupuncture education consisting of a minimum of one thousand didactic and five hundred clinical hours;

(2) Has successfully passed an acupuncture examination approved by the board which shall include a comprehensive written examination in acupuncture theory, diagnosis and treatment technique, and point location; and

(3) Has successfully completed a clean-needle technique course approved by the board.

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,348;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 718.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.